Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.067

Employment of attorneys by others restricted.

No officer, director, administrative agency, board, or commission of the state, other than the attorney general, shall employ, appoint or retain in employment any attorney for any administrative body, department, commission, agency, or tribunal or any other person to act as attorney in any legal or quasi legal capacity in the exercise of any of the powers or performance of any of the duties specified by law to be performed by the attorney general, except where it is provided by law to be the duty of the judge of any court or the prosecuting attorney of any county to employ or appoint such persons: PROVIDED, That RCW 43.10.040, and 43.10.065 through 43.10.080 shall not apply to the administration of the commission on judicial conduct, the state law library, the law school of the state university, the administration of the state bar act by the Washington State Bar Association, or the representation of an estate administered by the director of the department of revenue or the director's designee pursuant to chapter 11.28 RCW.

The authority granted by chapter 1.08 RCW, RCW 44.28.065, and 47.01.061 shall not be affected hereby.

[ 1997 c 41 s 9. Prior: 1987 c 364 s 1; 1987 c 186 s 7; prior: 1985 c 133 s 2; 1985 c 7 s 108; 1981 c 268 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.067; prior: (i) 1941 c 50 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11034-4. (ii) 1941 c 50 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11034-6. Formerly RCW 43.01.080.]